Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Chapter 4.1. Uniform Act for the Simplification of Fiduciary Security Transfers.

§§ 13.1-424 through 13.1-433.

Repealed by Acts 1996, c. 216.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

13.1-424

through 13.1-433, containing the Uniform Act for the Simplification of Fiduciary Security Transfers, was enacted by Acts 1960, c. 21, and amended by Acts 1990, c. 248.